giks22.lexc
!!!Multichar_Symbols +Noun +Verb +Adj +Sg +Pl Pre+ Suff+ Fut+ Pres+ Past+ Obj+ Sub+ Neg+!!!
Multichar_Symbols [N] [V] [ADJ] [SG] [PL] [PRE] [SUFF] [FUT] [PRES] [PAST] [OBJ] [SUB] [NEG]

LEXICON Root

Noun;
Verb;
Adjective;
Pronoun;
 


LEXICON Noun
NounrootC1;
NounrootC2;
NounrootC3a;
NounrootC3b;
NounrootC3c;
PfNoun;


LEXICON PfNoun
[N]MU-A[SG] : mu^ NounrootC1;
[N]MU-A[PL]  : a^ NounrootC1;
[N]MU-MI[SG] : mu^ NounrootC2;
[N]MU-MI[PL] : mi^ NounrootC2;
[N]KI-I[SG] : ki^ NounrootC3a;
[N]KI-I[PL] : i^ NounrootC3a;
[N]GI-I[SG] : gi^ NounrootC3b;
[N]GI-I[PL] : i^ NounrootC3b;
[N]KI-CI[SG] : ki^ NounrootC3c;
[N]KI-CI[PL] : ci^ NounrootC3c;



LEXICON NounrootC1
ndu #;
tumia #;
iritu #;
gendi #;
rutani #;

LEXICON NounrootC2
ti #;
kwa #;
ruthi #;
gunda #;

LEXICON NounrootC3a
ndu #;
rima #;
ratu #;

LEXICON NounrootC3b
ti #;

LEXICON NounrootC3c
kiondo #;


LEXICON Verb
SubPrefVerb; !!!Subject Prefix!!!
TenseVerb; !!!Tense Prefix!!!
ObjPrefVerb; !!!Object Prefix!!!
Verbroot; 
SuffVerb; !!!Verb Suffix!!!


LEXICON SubPrefVerb
SubPrefVerbC1;
SubPrefVerbC2;
SubPrefVerbC3a;
SubPrefVerbC3b;

LEXICON SubPrefVerbC1
[V][SUB][1P][SG] : n^ PresTense1; !!!change to TenseVerb!!!
[V][SUB][1P][PL] : tu^ PresTense1;
[V][SUB][2P][SG] : u^ PresTense1;
[V][SUB][2P][PL] : mu^ PresTense1;
[V][SUB][3P][SG] : a^ PresTense1;
[V][SUB][3P][PL] : ma^ PresTense1;


LEXICON SubPrefVerbC2
[V][SUB][SG] : u^ PresTense1;
[V][SUB][PL] : i^ PresTense1;


LEXICON SubPrefVerbC3a
[V][SUB][SG] : ki^ PresTense1;
[V][SUB][PL] : ci^ PresTense1;

LEXICON SubPrefVerbC3b
[V][SUB][SG] : gi^ PresTense1; !!!Best create SubPrefVerbC3b!!!
[V][SUB][PL] : i^ PresTense1;
!!![SUB][PL] : i^ TenseVerb;!!!

LEXICON TenseVerb
PresTense;
PastTense;
FutTense;

LEXICON PresTense
PresTense1; !!!right now!!!
PresTenseNeg;
!!!PresTense2;  Gives an idea of intention - PRES+V+ :gu^ | ku^ Verbroot!!!

LEXICON PresTenseNeg
[V][PRES][1P][SG][NEG] : ndi^ PresTense1;
[V][PRES][1P][PL][NEG] : tuti^ PresTense1;
[V][PRES][2P][SG][NEG] : ndu^ PresTense1;
[V][PRES][2P][PL][NEG] : muti^ PresTense1;
[V][PRES][3P][SG][NEG] : nda^ PresTense1;
[V][PRES][3P][PL][NEG] : mati^ PresTense1;



LEXICON PresTense1
[V][PRES] : ra^ Verbroot;
!!![PRES] : ra^ ObjPrefix;!!!



LEXICON PastTense
PastTense1; !!!earlier than yesterday!!!
PastTense2; !!!yesterday!!!
PastTense3; !!!earlier today!!!
PastTense4; !!!just now(immediate)!!!
PastTenseNeg1;
PastTenseNeg2;

LEXICON PastTense1
[V][PAST] : a^ Verbroot^ SuffVerb1;


LEXICON PastTense2
!!!PAST+V+ : ra^ Verbroot;!!!
[V][PAST] : ra^ Verbroot^ SuffVerb1;


LEXICON PastTense3
[V][PAST] : 0^ Verbroot^ SuffVerb2;


LEXICON PastTense4
[V][PAST] : a^ Verbroot;


LEXICON PastTenseNeg1
!!![PAST][NEG] : +na^ Verbroot;!!!
!!![PAST][NEG] : +a^ Verbroot; - Possible error !!!
[V][PAST][1P][SG][NEG] : ndi^ PastTense2;
[V][PAST][1P][PL][NEG] : tuti^ PastTense2;
[V][PAST][2P][SG][NEG] : ndu^ PastTense2;
[V][PAST][2P][PL][NEG] : muti^ PastTense2;
[V][PAST][3P][SG][NEG] : nda^ PastTense2;
[V][PAST][3P][PL][NEG] : mati^ PastTense2;

LEXICON PastTenseNeg2
[V][PAST][1P][SG][NEG] : ndi^ PastTense4;
[V][PAST][1P][PL][NEG] : tuti^ PastTense4;
[V][PAST][2P][SG][NEG] : ndu^ PastTense4;
[V][PAST][2P][PL][NEG] : muti^ PastTense4;
[V][PAST][3P][SG][NEG] : nda^ PastTense4;
[V][PAST][3P][PL][NEG] : mati^ PastTense4;

LEXICON FutTense
FutTense1a; !!! (gu) very soon today(immediate)!!!
FutTense1b; !!! (ku) very soon today(immediate)!!!
FutTense2; !!!later today or soon after today(intermediate)!!!
FutTense3a; !!! (ga) after today(distant)!!!
FutTense3b; !!! (ka) after today(distant)!!!


LEXICON FutTense1a
[V][FUT]: gu^ Verbroot;

LEXICON FutTense1b
[V][FUT] : ku^ Verbroot;


LEXICON FutTense2
[V][FUT] : ri^ Verbroot;


LEXICON FutTense3a
[V][FUT] : ga^ Verbroot;

LEXICON FutTense3b
[V][FUT] : ka^ Verbroot;


LEXICON ObjPrefVerb
ObjPrefixC1;
ObjPrefixC2;
ObjPrefixC3;

LEXICON ObjPrefixC1

[V][1P][OBJ][SG] : ni^ Verbroot;
[V][1P][OBJ][PL] : tu^ Verbroot;
[V][2P][OBJ][SG] : ku^ Verbroot;
[V][2P][OBJ][PL] : mu^ Verbroot;
[V][3P][OBJ][SG] : mu^ Verbroot;
[V][3P][OBJ][PL] : ma^ Verbroot;



LEXICON ObjPrefixC2
[V][OBJ][SG] : u^ Verbroot;
[V][OBJ][PL] : mi^ Verbroot;


LEXICON ObjPrefixC3
[V][OBJ][SG] : ki^ Verbroot;
[V][OBJ][PL] : ci^ Verbroot;


LEXICON Verbroot
thaambi^ SuffVerb;
igu^ SuffVerb;
gwati^ SuffVerb;
hot^ SuffVerb;
uri^ SuffVerb;
uk^ SuffVerb;
coki^ SuffVerb;
rugam^ SuffVerb;
rug^ SuffVerb;
rim^ SuffVerb;
um^ SuffVerb;
ukir^ SuffVerb;
twar^ SuffVerb;
geithi^ SuffVerb;
tig^ SuffVerb;
nyit^ SuffVerb;
kiny^ SuffVerb;
ug^ SuffVerb;
rehe^ SuffVerb;
hoy^ SuffVerb;
rum^ SuffVerb;
teithi^ SuffVerb;
hituk^ SuffVerb;
kaani^ SuffVerb;
thak^ SuffVerb;
amukir^ SuffVerb;
itiki^ SuffVerb;
hur^ SuffVerb;
rir^ SuffVerb;
cemani^ SuffVerb;

LEXICON SuffVerb
SuffVerb1; !!!Past tense ire!!!
SuffVerb2; !!!Present and Future tense a!!!
0 #;

LEXICON SuffVerb1
[V][SUFF]: ire #;


LEXICON SuffVerb2
[V][SUFF]: a #;


LEXICON Adjective
Adjectiveroot;
PrefAdjective1;
PrefAdjective2;
NumAdjective1;
NumAdjective2;

LEXICON PrefAdjective1
[ADJ]MU-A[SG] : mu^ Adjectiveroot;
[ADJ]MU-A[PL] : a^ Adjectiveroot;
[ADJ]MU-MI[SG] : mu^ Adjectiveroot;
[ADJ]MU-MI[PL] : mi^ Adjectiveroot;
[ADJ]KI-CI[SG] : ki^ Adjectiveroot;
[ADJ]KI-CI[PL] : ci^ Adjectiveroot;

LEXICON PrefAdjective2
[ADJ]MU-A[SG] : mu^ NumAdjective1;
[ADJ]MU-A[PL] : a^ NumAdjective1;
[ADJ]MU-MI[SG] : mu^ NumAdjective1;
[ADJ]MU-MI[PL] : mi^ NumAdjective1;
[ADJ]KI-CI[SG] : ki^ NumAdjective1;
[ADJ]KI-CI[PL] : ci^ NumAdjective1;

LEXICON NumAdjective1
mwe #;
iri #;
tatu #;
nya #;
tano #;
tandatu #;
mugwanja #;
nyanya #;


LEXICON NumAdjective2
mugwanja #;
kenda #;
ikumi #;

LEXICON Adjectiveroot
ega #;
nene #;
theru #;
geni #;
eru #;
uru #;
nini #;
ka #;
rume #;
ingi #;
gima #;
thaka #;
hiu #;
horo #;
tungu #;
oru #;
kuru #;

LEXICON Pronoun
PersPronoun;

LEXICON PersPronoun
nii #;
wee #;
we #;
ithui #;
inyui #;
o #;
